Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1222, subdivision 2d, is amended to read: Subd. 2d. Hot tubs on rental deleted text begin houseboatsdeleted text end new text begin propertynew text end . (a) new text begin Except as provided in paragraph (b), new text end a hot water pool intended for seated recreational use, including a hot tub or whirlpool, that is located on deleted text begin a houseboat that is rented to the publicdeleted text end new text begin the property of a stand-alone, single-unit rental property, offered for rent by the property owner or through a resort, and that is only intended to be used by the occupants of the rental property:new text end new text begin (1)new text end is not a public pool deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2)new text end is exempt from the requirements for public pools under new text begin subdivisions 1 to 2c, 4, and 5 and new text end Minnesota Rules, chapter 4717new text begin , except as otherwise provided in this paragraph; andnew text end new text begin (3) may be used by renters so long as: new text end new text begin (i) the water temperature in the hot water pool does not exceed 106 degrees Fahrenheit; new text end new text begin (ii) prior to check-in by each new rental party, the resort or property owner tests the water in the hot water pool for the concentration of chlorine or bromine, pH, and alkalinity, and the water in the hot water pool meets the requirements for disinfection residue, pH, and alkalinity in Minnesota Rules, part 4717.1750, subparts 4, 5, and 6; and new text end new text begin (iii) upon rental, the resort or property owner provides renters with a notice that there is a hot water pool on the property and that the hot water pool is not subject to all of the requirements in state law and rules for public poolsnew text end . (b)new text begin A hot water pool intended for seated recreational use, including a hot tub or whirlpool, that is located on a houseboat that is rented to the public:new text end new text begin (1) is not a public pool; new text end new text begin (2) is exempt from the requirements for public pools under subdivisions 1 to 2c, 4, and 5 and Minnesota Rules, chapter 4717; and new text end new text begin (3) is exempt from the requirements under paragraph (a), clause (3). new text end new text begin (c) A political subdivision must not adopt a local law, rule, or ordinance that prohibits the operation of, or establishes additional requirements for, a hot water pool that meets the criteria in paragraph (a) or (b). new text end new text begin (d)new text end A hot water pool under this subdivision must be conspicuously posted with the following notice to renters: "NOTICE This spa is exempt from new text begin certain new text end state and local sanitary requirements that prevent disease transmission. USE AT YOUR OWN RISK This notice is required under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1222, subdivision 2d."